Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-117
Nebraska Statehood Memorial; Nebraska State Historical Society; administration; maintenance; gifts, grants, bequests; accept.

The Nebraska State Historical Society shall be responsible for the administration and continued maintenance of the Nebraska Statehood Memorial and may accept gifts, grants, and bequests for such purposes.

Laws 1965, c. 556, § 4, p. 1839.